src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Skolt Sámi morphological analyser 

This file contains all definitions of symbols written by 
more than one character, and it contains the initial **Root** lexicon. 

# Definitions for **Multichar_Symbols** 
* **+NoTransl** No translation available 

## Grammatical tags 

### Tags for POS 
* **+A** = Adjective 
* **+Adp** = Adposition, i.e. Post- and Prepostion 
* **+Adv** = Adverb 
* **+CC** = Conjunction 
* **+CS** = Subjunction 
* **+Det** = Determiner 
* **+Interj** = Interjection 
* **+N** = Noun 
* **+Num** = Numeral 
* **+Po** = Postposition 
* **+Pr** = Preposition 
* **+Pron** = Pronoun 
* **+Pcle** = Particle 
* **+V** = Verb 
* **+Aux** = Auxiliary 

Pre-derivational POS tags for CG processing 
* **+Ex/N** = Noun stem before derivation 
* **+Ex/Num** = Number stem before derivation 
* **+Ex/A** = Adjective stem before derivation 
* **+Ex/V** = Verb stem before derivation 

### Tags for sub-POS 

* **+Prop** - Proper noun 
* **+Pers** - Personal Pronoun 
* **+Dem** - Demonstrative Pronoun 
* **+Interr** - Interrogative Pronoun 
* **+Refl** - Reflexive Pronoun 
* **+Recipr** - Reciprocal Pronoun 
* **+Rel** - Relative Pronoun 
* **+Indef** - Indefinitive Pronoun 
* **+Coll** - Collective numerals 
* **+Arab** - Arabic numeral 
* **+Rom** - Roman numeral 
* **+Pass** - hallat/haddat not in use 
* **+Qnt** - SHOULD THIS be here or a Sem/Qnt 
* **+Pred** 
* **+Attr** Attributive form 
* **+Distr** Distributive 
* **+Temp** 

### Types of adverbs 
* **+Parenthetic** 
* **+AssocColl** 
* **+Guess** 

### Number 
* **+Sg** Singular = õõutilååkk 
* **+Du** Dual = kuõiʹtilååkk 
* **+Pl** Plural = määŋgailååkk 

### Case 
* **+Nom** Nominative = nominativ 
* **+Gen** Genitive 
* **+Acc** Accusative 
* **+Ill** Illative 
* **+Loc** Locative 
* **+Com** Comitative 
* **+Ess** Essive 
* **+Par** Partative 
* **+Prl** Prolative 
* **+Abe** Abessive 
* **+Lat** Lative lääinas, säämas, toimmpââjas 

symbols ? 
* **+Ine** 
* **+Ela** 

### Possessive suffix 
* **+PxSg1** 
* **+PxSg2** 
* **+PxSg3** 
* **+PxPl1** 
* **+PxPl2** 
* **+PxPl3** 

### Adjective declension 
* **+Der/Comp** comparative as in other Sami languages, depricate +Comp 
* **+Der/Superl** superlative previously Der/mos Der/umus Der/ummus, depricate +Superl 
* **+Ord** - 
* **+GenAttr** Genitive attribute used as adjective? 

### Verb forms      Veʹrbbååʹbleʹǩ 
* **+Actor** 
* **+Actio** 
* **+ActEss** -men  
* **+NomAg** CHECK ME this is not the same as Der/NomAg, which is a derivation
* **+Kin** Kin term This may need to be removed, let Sem/Hum-kin suffice 
* **+Ind** Indicative mood 
* **+Prs** Present 
* **+Prt** Preterite 
* **+Pot** Potential mood 
* **+Cond** Conditional mood 
* **+Imprt** Imperative mood 
* **+ImprtII** 
* **+Sup** 
* **+Inf** 
* **+Ger** gerund +Ess, +Loc +Instr 
* **+Instr** -eeʹl 
* **+ConNeg** Negation Form, i.e. mõõn, reäǥǥ, jueʹjj: Indicative present except indef person; imperative Sg2 and Pl2
* **+ConNegII** Negation Form II: mõnnu, riâkˈku, juõkˈku: Indicative present indef person; imperative Sg3, Pl1, Pl2, Pl3 (there is an overlap at +Impert+Pl2)
* **+Neg** 
* **+PrsPrc** 
* **+PrfPrc** 
* **+VGen** 
* **+VAbess** 

###Valence
* **+IV** Intransitive 
* **+TV** Transitive 
* **+Act** Active voice 
* **+Pass** Passive voice 

### Person-number 
* **+Sg1** first person singular 
* **+Sg2** second person singular 
* **+Sg3** third person singular 
* **+Du1** first person dual 
* **+Du2** second person dual 
* **+Du3** third person dual 
* **+Pl1** first person plural 
* **+Pl2** second person plural 
* **+Pl3** third  person plural 
* **+Sg4** impersonal fourth person, in MT a Pl4 might be needed 
* **+13** used in combination with +Imp+13+ConNeg 
* **+2** used in combination with +Imp+2+ConNeg 

### Homonymy 
* **+Hom1** 
* **+Hom2** 
* **+Hom3** 
* **+Hom4** 

### Derivation 

All non-positional derivations should be preceded by this tag, to make it possible 
to target regular expressions at all derivations in a language-independent way: 
just specify +Der|+Der1 .. +Der5 and you are set. 

* **+Der** 
* **+Der/Ord** Num»A ordinal
* **+Der/Car**  N»A -tem, -teʹmes 
* **+Der/Dimin** diminutive derivation N»N was Der/Dim,
* **+Dimin** diminutive without derivation 2025-04-04 jaska
* **+Der/st**  V»V was diminutive subitive Der/sted, Der/âʹstted 
* **+Der/ad** ordinals to nouns 
* **+Der/i**  N»A luõss >> luõʹssi, čääʹcc >> čäccai 'rich in' Sg.Ill 
* **+Der/PALi** rupp » ruʹppi ATTR ruʹppes DEPRICATE 
* **+Der/teqm** carative derivation N»A, V»A -teʹm 
* **+Der/t** carative derivation N»A for subsequent derivation 
Noun derivation 
* **+Der/musj** deverbal derivation V»N architype mõš and mmuš was Der/MOsh 
* **+Der/vuota** A»N -vuõtt 
* **+Der/lasj**  
* **+Der/neqkh** N»N resident of place 
* **+Der1**  
* **+Der2** 
* **+Der3** 
* **+Der4** 
* **+Der5** 

Verb derivation 
* **+Der/InchL** incoative V»V -škueʹtted 
* **+Der/Caus** causative V»V, was Der/ted and Der/âʹtted 
* **+Der/jed** inchoative V»V also middle 
* **+Der/oottyd** reflexive reciprocal V»V -õõttâd 
* **+Der/oovvyd**  V»V kulsted: kulstõõvvâd 
* **+Der/oollyd**  V»V -õõllâd 
* **+Der/stoollyd**  V»V -stõõllâd 
* **+Der/stoovvyd**  V»V -stõõvvâd 
* **+Der/toovvyd** privative + translative N»V --tõõvvâd 
* **+Der/ched** frequentative V»V for ʹCCed verbs -čed 
* **+Der/NomAg** agent V»N 
* **+Der/NomAct** action V»N +Der/m 

## Tags for originating language 

The following tags are used to guide conversion to IPA: loan words 
and foreign names are usually pronounced (approximately) as in the 
originating (majority) language. Instead of trying to identify the 
correct pronunciation based on phonotactics (orthotactics actually), 
we tag all words that can't be correctly transcribed using the SME 
transcriber with source language codes. Once tagged, it is possible 
to split the lexical transducer in smaller ones according to langu- 
age, and apply different IPA conversion to each of them. 

The principle of tagging is that we only tag to the extent needed, 
and following a priority: 
1. any untagged word is pronounced with SME orthographic conventions 
1. NNO and NOB have identical pronunciation, NNO is only used if 
different in spelling from NOB 
1. SWE has mostly the same pronunciation as NOB, and is only used 
if different in spelling from NOB 
1. Occasionally even SME (the default) may be tagged, to block other 
languages from being specified, mainly during semi-automatic 
language tagging sessions 

All in all, we want to get as much correctly transcribed to IPA 
with as little work as possible. On the other hand, if more words 
are tagged than strictly needed, this should pose no problem as 
long as the IPA conversion is correct - at least some words will 
get the same pronunciation whether read as SME or NOB/NNO/SWE. 

* **+OLang/SME** - North Sámi 
* **+OLang/SMJ** - Lule Sámi 
* **+OLang/SMA** - South Sámi 
* **+OLang/SMN** - Inari Sámi 
* **+OLang/SMS** - Skolt Sámi 
* **+OLang/HUN** - Hungarian
* **+OLang/RUS** - Russian 
* **+OLang/FIN** - Finnish 
* **+OLang/SWE** - Swedish 
* **+OLang/NOB** - Norw. bokmål 
* **+OLang/NNO** - Norw. nynorsk 
* **+OLang/ENG** - English 
* **+OLang/UND** - Undefined 
* +OLang/PARA - parallelle navn, navnet skal ikke overføres til andre samisk språk

### Government tags 
* **+%<acc%>** 
* **+%<ess%>** 
* **+%<gen%>** 
* **+%<ill%>** 
* **+%<loc%>** this will be added to the preposition tagging **mâŋŋa jââđast** 
* **+%<nom%>** 

### Semantic tags 

* **+Sem/Act** = Activity 
* **+Sem/Adr** = Webadr 
* **+Sem/Amount** = Amount 
* **+Sem/Ani** Animate       (names) 
* **+Sem/Ani-fish** Animate    
* **+Sem/Aniprod** = Animal Product 
* **+Sem/Ant** Anthroponym  (names) 
* **+Sem/Body** = Bodypart 
* **+Sem/Body-abstr** = siellu, vuoig?a, jierbmi 
* **+Sem/Build** = Building 
* **+Sem/Build-part** = Part of Bulding, like the closet 
* **+Sem/Cat** = Category 
* **+Sem/Clth** = Clothes 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl** = Jewelery 
* **+Sem/Clth-part** = part of clothes, boallu, sávdnji... 
* **+Sem/Constellation**  
* **+Sem/Ctain** = Container 
* **+Sem/Ctain-abstr** = Abstract container like bank account 
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth** = Soft container, like a rucksack 
* **+Sem/Curr** = Currency like dollár, Not Money 
* **+Sem/Dance** = Dance 
* **+Sem/Date** = Number as date
* **+Sem/Dir** = Direction like GPS-kursa 
* **+Sem/Domain** = Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions) 
* **+Sem/Drink** = Drink 
* **+Sem/Dummytag** = Dummytag 
* **+Sem/Edu** = Educational event 
* **+Sem/Event** = Event 
* **+Sem/Feat** = Feature, like Árvu 
* **+Sem/Feat-measr** = Psychological feauture 
* **+Sem/Feat-phys** = Physiological feature, ivdni, fárda 
* **+Sem/Feat-psych** = Psychological feauture 
* **+Sem/Fem** = Female name 
* **+Sem/Food** = Food 
* **+Sem/Food-med** = Medicine 
* **+Sem/Furn** = Furniture 
* **+Sem/Game** = Game 
* **+Sem/Geom** = Geometrical object 
* **+Sem/Group** = Animal or Human Group 
* **+Sem/Holiday** 
* **+Sem/Hum** = Human 
* **+Sem/Hum-abstr** = Human abstract 
* **+Sem/ID** = number as identity tag, not as amount
* **+Sem/Ideol** = Ideology 
* **+Sem/Kin** for deprication to Sem/Hum-kin 
* **+Sem/Hum-kin** = 
* **+Sem/Lang** = Language 
* **+Sem/Mal** = Male name 
* **+Sem/Manner** 
* **+Sem/Mat** = Material for producing things 
* **+Sem/Measr** = Measure 
* **+Sem/Money** = Has to do with money, like wages, not Curr(ency) 
* **+Sem/Obj**              (names) 
* **+Sem/Obj-clo** = Cloth 
* **+Sem/Obj-cogn** = Cloth 
* **+Sem/Obj-el** = (Electrical) machine or apparatus 
* **+Sem/Obj-ling** = Object with something written on it 
* **+Sem/Obj-rope** = flexible ropelike object 
* **+Sem/Obj-surfc** = Surface object 
* **+Sem/Org** Organization (names) 
* **+Sem/Part** = Feature, oassi, bealli 
* **+Sem/Perc-cogn** = Cloth 
* **+Sem/Perc-emo** = Emotional perception 
* **+Sem/Perc-phys** = Physical perception 
* **+Sem/Perc-psych** = Psychical perception 
* **+Sem/Plant** = Plant 
* **+Sem/Plant-part** = Plant part 
* **+Sem/Plc** Place name   (names) 
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr** = Abstract place 
* **+Sem/Plc-elevate** = Place 
* **+Sem/Plc-line** = Place 
* **+Sem/Plc-water** = Place 
* **+Sem/Pos** = Position (as in social position job) 
* **+Sem/Process** = Process 
* **+Sem/Prod** = Product 
* **+Sem/Prod-audio** = Audio product 
* **+Sem/Prod-cogn** = Cognition product 
* **+Sem/Prod-ling** = Linguistic product 
* **+Sem/Prod-vis** = Visual product 
* **+Sem/Rel** = Relation 
* **+Sem/Route** = Route 
* **+Sem/Rule** = Rule or convention 
* **+Sem/Semcon** = Semantic concept 
* **+Sem/Sign** = Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation) 
* **+Sem/Sport** = Sport 
* **+Sem/State** = 
* **+Sem/State-sick** = Illness 
* **+Sem/Substnc** = Substance, like Air and Water 
* **+Sem/Sur** Surname       (names) 
* **+Sem/Symbol** = Symbol 
* **+Sem/Time** = Time 
* **+Sem/Time-clock** = Time 
* **+Sem/Tool** = Prototypical tool for repairing things 
* **+Sem/Tool-catch** = Tool used for catching (e.g. fish) 
* **+Sem/Tool-clean** = Tool used for cleaning 
* **+Sem/Tool-it** = Tool used in IT 
* **+Sem/Tool-measr** = Tool used for measuring 
* **+Sem/Tool-music** = Music instrument 
* **+Sem/Tool-write** = Writing tool 
* **+Sem/Txt** = Text (girji, lávlla...) 
* **+Sem/Veh** = Vehicle 
* **+Sem/Wpn** = Weapon 
* **+Sem/Wthr** = The Weather or the state of ground 
* **+Sem/Year** = Year
